We had been to Lalime's years ago and had forgotten it until I couldn't get a reservation anywhere else on a Saturday night.  My first impression was of the hostess.  She had a lovely smile and nice haircut but was dressed like a homeless person, in washed out sweat pants and were too short, an out dated man's Hawaii shirt, black crew socks and sequined shoes.  She was very nice but I was taken aback that a restaurant of this caliber would allow this style of dress on the first person you meet at the door.  She would have been better off in a black pair of pants and white shirt.  Every thing else was lovely.  They did forget to bring our bread but in general very attentive and friendly.  The food was excellent.  My husband had the burger with bacon jam, outstanding.  I had the halibut and we split a caesar salad.  I enjoyed the meal and the ambience although it was a noisy Saturday night.  I would go again but I hope the give the hostess a uniform or a clothing consult that lives up to the standard of the restaurant.
So I really wanted to like this place. And let me just say that I blame the owners for my experience and not the staff. We came here last night for my mom's birthday. We walked in and there was no host there. We had to wait a couple of minutes for the host to even check us in. Then after we were seated our waitress came up and took out drink order and brought us our drinks and left. We never saw her again. We waited about 15 minutes (and I'm not exaggerating) unattended to, past ready to order until finally I had to wave down another waitress to help us. In the wait staff's defense there were only two of them waiting tables even though it was a nearly full house. She was very kind and apologetic and was the only redeeming quality of our experience. The food was ok. Definitively not worth the price though. I don't know maybe we came on an off night. But I was not impressed and probably won't be returning.
Eating at Lalime's is definitely a specific kind of eating experience. Right off the bat--the food is delicious, very unique, and artsy. Not the run of the mill half chicken or salmon plate. The chef knows what's up in combining savory ingredients to make a complete and satisfying meal.It is on the pricey side, not crazy, but definitely for a special occasion or fancy-ish date.My boyfriend loved his burger, nice and juicy. My halibut was beautifully prepared and tasty. Actually the cauliflower soup was my favorite part of the meal.My advice--go with an open mind to try something new, don't go if you have a time constraint and definitely don't come starving because there may be a wait or get yourself a reservation.
The food, and service is excellent! It gets crowded so I recommend making a reservation. Unique and creative menu with careful design. It's just that I didn't find anything I particularly wanted so I settled for a burger. But don't get me wrong the burger was delicious. Rib eye was tender and juicy. Also got a cauliflower dish with egg. That was okay. As for appetizers, MUST get the mussles. It's chilled which isn't what I typically have but I was pleasantly surprised. Especially with their sauce. Also recommend the lamb hearts if that's your thing. Sauce is good. I didn't think there was anything special about the shrimp cocktail. As for desserts I got the lemon pound cake. If you like nuts then this dessert is jam packed full of it. Also something super sour on the top. I got the affogato which was lovely.
#36I am almost left speechless.  So delicious, what a wonderful choice for a romantic dinner. The only word that comes to mind at present is: Wooooooooooow!We arrived around 8PM for our reservation.  The place was quite crowded, which is always a good sign in my book.  We checked  in at the hostess stand and decided to wait at the bar and enjoy a cocktail while our table was being prepared.  The bartender was super friendly and was also able to explain a few cocktails which employ the use of bourbons from the fancy drink menu.  After our drinks were placed before us, the host came and placed them on a little tray and showed us to our table. Walking down a tiny set of stairs into the lower dining area, we took our spot at a romantic little table near the window.  The dinning room was dimly lit, mostly by candle light, and the music was pleasant and soft.  The place was pretty busy, servers bustling around, guests enjoying each other's company as they worked through their meals.  Our server, Janine, came over and greeted us with a sweet smile on her face.  She was ultra friendly and very hospitable.  Janine offered us a few suggestions, shared with us a few nightly special items that were not on the menu, and helped us make some decisions.  My companion and I ordered several items:Deviled Eggs with Duck and HerringCelery Root Apple Soup w Brown ButterLamb Hearts with Chimichurri Yellowfin Tuna CrudoFried Rock CodGrilled Pork Chop w Brussel Sprouts and PolentaI was not sure how we were going to eat all of these delicacies, but that was beside the point...We started with the soup and tuna.  Both were spectacular.  The tuna was soft and fresh, and the soup was by far one of the best soups I have had the pleasure of tasting.  The brown butter added seriously delicious undertones to the celery, the apple was a simple thought that really delivered flavor. About this point Janine came over to the table and said, "We would like to offer you a dish on the house, even though you ordered a lot of food."  Wow--nice.  She left us with a bowl of grilled ox tails that my partner enjoyed. Then the deviled eggs arrived.  They were so amazing.  The herring complimented the duck in a superior fashion.  Alongside of the egg delivery, the lamb heart kebob made its debut.  I will have to admit that the lamb was one of the stars of the evening.  The skewers were cooked over an open flame which left a delicious char on the outside and the accompaniment of the chimichurri was spot on. Finally, the main courses of cod and pork chop--both of which were to die for.  The cod was served on a small plate with a beef kraut, fennel and sunflower sprouts--lovely.  The pork chop was easily the biggest pork chop I had ever seen. It was also prepared over an open flame and was deliciously charred, juicy and seasoned to perfection.  I thought we would need to have someone carry us out we were so full of wonderful foods, but somehow, my companion ordered a dessert.  We had an espresso and enjoyed the rest of the evening over that delicious dessert.  Everything was sensational and quite memorable.  I will definitely return for another fine meal in the future.  Stephani Smiles for Lalime's ;)#whodoesntlovefrenchfood
We are apparently not the only former fans who have become disillusioned with Lalime's erratic food and on/off - mostly off - front &amp; back coordination. On a Thursday evening you could have fired the proverbial cannon and not hit anyone. By 8p half the seats were still empty.- Duck liver. Overcooked, despite waitress' assurance it would be medium-rare. Between the chewy tough bread, the overcooking, and the clumsy braised alliums with its super-abundance of unneeded chopped walnuts, this creation had no chance for success. Both of us thought this a terrible dish.- Sand dabs. Greasy separated butter sauce - guess no one in the kitchen knows how to make a proper beurre blanc or variants thereof. Unboned tiny whole fishies minus heads; when was the last time you received unboned fish? Yeah, us too. A surprise, not a good one.- White corn soup. Unlike La Folie's superlative version, this one was just corn, pureed in a processor. It might take you five min. in your kitchen, blindfolded. No herbs, no additions, no interest.- King salmon. Great flavor, perfectly cooked, crisp skin. But "kitchen sink-itis" ran rampant here. A lovely cauliflower puree and tasty chopped asparagus were drowned out by an oversalted Kalamata olive tapenade plus unnecessary chopped walnuts (again?!?) and fresh orange dice, muddling all the flavors. Half the dish was divine, but the other half was clumsy and unbalanced, serving no purpose except to crowd a plate with one from Column B and one from Column D and one from Column G....ad infinitum ad nauseum. I call it cooking by Food Network, and that is NOT a compliment.The sole winner of the night was good enough to come back for...although it was the ONLY dish that qualified as such: - Pastrami Reuben, listed separately on the menu as "After 8". If the kitchen is not busy, they may agree to make it early in the evening, as they did for us. The pastrami is house-cured, and Spouse called it the best pastrami he's had since the original (not the current deli of name) Max's Diner back in the mid-1980's. The rye is tasty, and if they'd rinsed the sauerkraut it would have been perfect!Note that the fries are tolerable - not great, but housemade and very crispy. They're thin, irregular batons with the skins still on, and the crispness makes them acceptable. The ketchup is housemade and a little too salty, however. We'd suggest telling the kitchen to not salt the fries, if you're like Spouse and use a lot of ketchup with them. Even being a salt lover, he thought the fries and ketchup had too much salt in total.Dessert: Meyer lemon cake with lemon curd and strawberries. What came was a classic Italian polenta poundcake, flavored with lemon with a very good lemon curd and the season's outstanding berries. I asked for a cappuccino, which as usual was a latte in disguise. Both were adequate, not exciting.Save for the Reuben, there is no reason to come here when there are now so many other, better restaurants in the EBay. Lalime has stood still and even regressed over the last decade, and they are no longer standing alone in this area.
I have been to this restaurant a few times and had an excellent experience.   My last visit was not one of those times. I had asked that my entree not include any cilantro.   I am one of the 5 percent that HATES it.  Of course it came with it.  I could smell the cilantro as they were placing the dish in front of me. I sent the dish back nut was looked at like I was the bad guy.It as fortunate for the restaurant that our dinner companions was a business associate of my husband's and his wife visiting from New York.  Normally I would have filed a complaint with management.Taking past visits into consideration, I have decided to give a rating of 3 stars instead of 1 star.
really loved this place in Berkeley. it's very unassuming on the outside, but nicely decorated inside and somehow much larger than it appears. the dining areas are split up in different rooms and seating arrangements which make each area more intimateservice is outstanding. we brought our own wine (I think the corkage was $15 which is very reasonable) and even though we were meeting another couple and arrived early they seated us while we waited for the other couple. one of my restaurant peeves is when they make you wait until everyone is there before seating you, even if you have a reservation.the menu changes seasonally and is printed daily depending on what fresh food is available. love that. we took the waitress's advice on a few small plates to share. beets, chilled bonita and a cold seafood salad were all fantastic. we had a mushroom "dirty" rice, kinda like a risotto which was excellent.so great food + great service add up to a memorable experience. looking forward to my next visit here!
I love Lalimes.  It is always good.  Service is solid, prices are reasonable and its ambiance is welcoming.
My boyfriend and I went to lalimes for the first time for our anniversary. Everything was fantastic. Food was great and well portioned. Server suggested great, fitting wines.  They even put happy anniversary confetti on our table. This place is a gem
I love this place! We've been coming here for special occasions for over 10 years, and it's always been consistently excellent!
Tasty stuff. We got the swordfish and the cauliflower egg dish. Both great. Kinda pricey but worth it for good, sustainable food. Nice library vibe too.
Classically inspired dishes, artfully prepared from fresh ingredients and served by hardworking cheerful people.  I've driven by here dozens of times and never noticed it. Now, I'm coming back and bringing my friends.
I wanted to give this restaurant a five star rating, but unfortunately, I can't . We were a party of 5 on Sat nite, all of us celebrating. Nice table, nice waitress. I asked our waitress for her feedback  as I was wavering between ordering the baby back ribs or the pork chop . She said that they were known for their pork chop. She asked how I wanted it cooked and I said done as I don't eat raw pork.After delivering our entrees, our waitress did not return to check on us . The restaurant was very busy. My pork was raw and I could not eat it and was unable to get her attention. When the bus boy came and removed our plates  I showed him my plate of raw pork and said he would tell our waitress. She came over with the dessert menus and was not told about my entree. She was very sorry and did take it off the bill.This is a fine dining establishment, how do they serve raw pork ? What happened to instant read thermometers?
I really enjoy this cozy North Berkeley stand by - love the comfortable but classy decor, the friendly neighborhood vibe (the bartender is a doll), the excellent service without any attitude, and of course the wonderfully prepared food.  The menu is primarily based on local seasonal ingredients, with classic influences and a California twist.  On different occasions have had seafood, fowl, lamb and beef all on point with well considered accompaniments.  Most recently the apple and savory stuffed quail was a nice example served on a bed of wild rice.  My appetizer was a very nice smoked herring accompanied by crostini, mustard, and house made pickle assortment.  Dessert was a wonderful apple/pear tart with vanilla gelato.  Service as always is attentive without being overbearing, and the staff know the menu very well and are happy to advise if requested.This has become my go to spot for entertaining out of town business guests and friends who only have a day or two in the area, it's a Berkeley classic and will stay on my list of spots for such occasions.
Great place to eat and drink and relax.  The ambience is casual/dressy.  Enjoyed the service and food .  Will be back!!
We LOVED it! Good food &amp; exceptional service! The service was so good that when we asked for suggestions on a good Bourbon drink, one of the owners called the bartender over from behind the bar to our table to discuss. I was impressed :)An all round GREAT experience!My only complaint is that it is a little pricey..definitely a date restaurant :)We ordered:The oysters - super fresh &amp; deelishThe octopus - yummy but the serving size was kind of tinyThe Roasted beet salad- so yum, the beets were nice &amp; sweet.The New York Strip- cooked perfectly and I loved the vinegary Swiss chard it came with. The chocolate bread pudding with a scoop of vanilla gelato- the bread pudding was so good. Crisp on the outside and creamy inside but not too chocolately &amp; it comes with this super tasty toffee chocolate sauce.The gelato wasn't as good though. It had a grainy texture :(I'll definitely be back!!
Lalime's is a Berkeley institution that has never rested on its laurels.  It is still run by the family that founded the restaurant, and their personal touch is evident in the outstanding cuisine and the warm and lovely ambiance. My family has been going to Lalime's since they first opened. Lalime's has hosted every major event for my family including weddings, birthdays, and anniversaries. I can't recommended this wonderful restaurant highly enough. Go, enjoy, and join the cadre of Lalime's loyalists. You will love being a part of the Lalime's extended family.
We were very happy with this meal.  The menu is great -- lots of appealing options at different price points.  I really liked the chicken on a biscuit app, and my soft-egg entree was creative and delicious.  Drinks are good too.  As is dessert.  Just good!
Love chef Anthony's food! everything was delicious. :)
DON'T DRINK THE WATER!Seriously, the waiter brought water and it tasted like it came from the local Y. We immediately ordered tap water. Cocktails were delicious.  I had the burger, which was good but not great, and a beet salad, which was similar. Nothing wrong with either, but they were also just ordinary, with no real surprises. The salad was a little overdressed and the portion was maybe too huge. The biggest surprise was the fries that came with the burger: slender little matchsticks, they were light and delicate and went well in the mayo dipping sauce. An excellent combination. I felt like I was back in Belgium.I skipped dessert, but my friend had it (affogate) and it seemed okay but not great. A forgettable affogato? I did have a cappuccino, which was okay but not great. The place had too many tables crammed into it and an odd decor that required tables to be squeezed into certain walls and sections. It felt too crowded. I was almost in my neighbor's lap, and she was a very large woman with BO. I did not want to be in her lap.
I have to say my second time was better than my first.  I barely remember my first time. Yet, my second meal at La Lime was highly memorable! I will spare you the run down of our meal, but it did provide a lot of conversation and plenty of fun flavor, texture, and taste combinations you better deliver for around $15-$25 and entree.  The 4 of us shared many a good dish and had a great time enjoying and getting all foodie on the food. We love that here the Bay, right!? The wine and liquor list is also awesome, which may be why some of the details of the menu are fuzzy, among other reasons........This cute little place is very similar ambiance wise (to me at least) to Bay Wolf, it's in a house converted to a restaurant in a fancy neighborhood, except here at La Lime it's even more quiet and residential. Located in North Berkeley, the food was a bit more lively, light, and delightful on the pallet than I remember. We were the youngest party as a group of 30- somethings in the building, but that's good for me, because La Lime has a grounded, classic feel. Plus the service is damn good.   This is part of the Jimmy Beans, now closed Sea Salt, and apparently the just-sold restaurant-T-REX restaurant group K2, so what they do, they usually do well. Check it out if you are in the market for some California fine dining in Berkeley!
We have been to Lalime's several times in the past but were never to hot for it. Since it had been six years since we had been there we gave it another shot. What a difference some time and a new chef makes. We ordered entrees, salad, cocktails, and dessert. Everything was fantastic. Meals were the perfect size. We cleaned every scrap off our plates. I hate mezcal but after trying a sip of the mezcal cocktail I liked it so much I ordered one for myself. Lalime's is now back on our radar and we won't be waiting so long to dine there again.
My friend and I planned an 18-person birthday dinner at Lalime's for a good friend of ours.  I had never been there before but the reviews were good, and they provided us with a well-priced prix-fixe menu (with choices!) so we opted for this place.Firstly, when we walked into the restaurant, and the space was gorgeous.  They had set up our tables (2 long tables) in the downstairs space facing the street and because of how the area was set up, it was pretty much like we had our own private dining area!  Very nice.Our prix-fixe came with an appetizer, entree, and unlimited nonalcoholic drinks.  For my appetizer, I got the fresh rigatoni, which everyone was crazy about.  People who didn't get this appetizer were jealous and stole a lot off our plates.  Rigatoni was indeed fresh and large, had a mushroom/meat sauce, and I don't know if I can have non-fresh rigatoni again after having this!!  Great dish.  One of the others I tried were the salt cod croquettes which were well-crisped and good (but I was still glad to have gotten myself the rigatoni).Next, the entree.  I got the grilled hangar steak which came atop your standard spinach and mashed potatoes with a gravy type sauce drizzled over everything.  My slices of steak were cooked wonderfully and overall, it was a good dish (although I must admit, I've had better and it became a bit salty after awhile even with the spinach and potatoes).  I also tried the Berkshire pork, which seemed and tasted like a huge slab of chasu ramen pork.  I tasted two different people's and I would say it was a bit inconsistent.  Some was overcooked and too salty and some was really fatty and juicy and good.  I also tried the salmon entree which was moist and delicious.  If I were a bigger fan of salmon, this would have hit the spot.Everyone seemed to enjoy the dinner, and the service was fantastic.  Friendly and attentive, but also let us enjoy our dinner.  They also cut the birthday cake wonderfully for all 18 of us (and included the cake-slicing fee in the prix-fixe so it wasn't pricey!).I would definitely recommend Lalime's for a large group dinner -- the food, service, and atmosphere were pleasing to everyone, and we had a great time!!   Arrangements were pretty easy to make and they gave us options for prix-fixes as well as little touches like personalized menus that made the evening special.  Thank you Lalime's!
I remember visiting my friend Diane at her place in Berkeley and walking over to Solano Avenue and going by this charming restaurant situated right among the rows of traditional homes.  Last month, after reading rave reviews about the revamped Lalime's, I checked it out and was stunned to realize it was the same place right around the corner from her old place.Featuring selections from a traditional American and Mediterranean menu, Lalime's is simply a grand slam.  There wasn't a single disappointment and coming from this jaded foodie, that's saying something.  We started with a fresh pear salad with treviso, endive, candied pecans, and Pt. Reyes blue cheese where all the flavors blended together harmoniously.  Similarly, the ahi tuna tartar with habanero-infused sesame oil, Asian pear, pine nuts, and mint just melted in your mouth with each flavor ringing out.  Our entrees were mind-blowingly good, we didn't want to stop eating even though we were stuffed by the ample portions.  We had the Montana 'Piemontese' New York strip steak with balsamic jus/Cabernet butter, horseradish potato purée, chanterelle and hedgehog mushrooms, and spinach as well as the venison chops with a allspice rub, brandied cherry sauce, red quinoa with dried fruit, garnet yam-vanilla bean purée, hazelnut Brussels sprouts.  It's surprising when the sides stand up in flavor to the rich meats but they absolutely did, it was one of the delights of this full-featured meal.  By the time we got to dessert, we were in a euphoric food coma so the dessert was a blur but I just recall it was made of slices of heaven, Xanadu, and oasis.As unsuspecting as Lalime's location was, the decor was similarly warm and understated.  In fact, the only knock on this place was the service, which was at times just a bit disorganized and inattentive.Overall, this is a neighborhood gem and worth crossing the bridge for over and over again.  Can't wait to go back.
Great food and service. It has been a little while since I have eaten here and I was happy by the selection of great tasting food and wines.The service was excellent and the location is perfect though a bit of traffic during prime time.Highly recommend the place! Definitely coming back :)
Lalime's keeps getting better and better. Since my last review one and a half years ago, my husband and I have been several times. We have taken out of town guests from Europe there, our neighbors and just ourselves.  It is great for a special occasion or just when you feel like really good food and drinks in an elegant, modern and unpretentious atmosphere. Lalime's is located in a quiet North Berkeley neighborhood, so it truly is a hidden gem. Because of our great experiences, which keep getting better, It is now one of favorite restaurants in Berkeley and the SF Bay Area. The restaurant has a vibrant atmosphere, innovative cuisine, and an amazing selection of specialty cocktails and wines. They always treat us very well there. Sometimes when they are busy they might be a little slow, but it is well worth it. We recently went there for a special occasion and enjoyed the fall menu. The menu always focuses on seasonal ingredients. For a starter we had an outstanding Kabocha soup with toasted pepitas. We also loved our entrees and a dessert of panna cotta with pomegranate. The dessert menu vastly improved in the last two years, and now it is hard to decide. I highly recommend Lalime's.
Enjoyed our meal here in every way. Great cocktails, professional, low key staff, good wine, and excellent food. Our caesar salad (divided generously between us) was perfectly dressed and featured a small tasty anchovy as a perfect complement. My chicken was  crispy outside and moist inside; my husband's pork chop was cooked perfectly, also very moist and flavorful. I loved the creative sides and delicious desserts. We had the chocolate and vanilla ice cream and the berry crumble. All in all a perfect meal.
I went with a big group, and a young lively one at that.  We had a nice spacious round table, the waitress was interactive and friendly. We loved all the food we ordered, from appetizer to entree to the drinks. Not a place to go on a budget, but it was fun to splurge and taste some quality, tasty food. The chef's at this place really know what's up.HIGHLY RECOMMENDED....I don't really have a narrowed down recommendation because our group ordered a lot of different meats/seafoods and all were enjoyed and beautifully presented.
My partner and I had dinner here, as I didn't want to cook on my birthday.  As we entered the front entrance, we were taken back to someones house.  Very inviting and reminded us of Baywolf.   As we arrived 30 minutes earlier than our reservation, they had no problem seating us. We both shared the lamb sausage with pasta and the veal sweetbreads as the first course. The sweetbreads were lightly coated and fried. Served with beans and a chopped egg dressing, it was both light and heavy.  Savory and tasty, I couldn't get enough.  The lamb sausage and pasta was also very savory.   The sauce was rich and tangy.   I sopped up the leftover with the bread served. My entree was the braised lamb shank, while my partners ,the steak.   Here is where my only disappointment came.  The lamb shank was so tiny.  Maybe I am used to a really large lamb shank as appropriate size. But this one was the size of a baby lamb.  When it was placed in front of me, my partner said, "No, we don't have to share plates. I feel sorry for you." His steak plate was quite a large size, that he gave me a portion to share.   Other than that, the taste of the lamb shank was delicious.  The sauce of the rice porridge, was heavy and rich.   Enough for me to also finish the remaining bread with it.  Yes, that small portioned.... :(Overall a great evening. The entire waitstaff was very attentive.   My advice, order the sweetbreads and steak and you are set for the evening.
Others have described this restaurant's strengths: its cozy, convivial neighborhood atmosphere, creative menu, and friendly service. We dined here for the first time a few nights ago and were very pleased: all of our dishes were attractive and showed great care for balanced textures and flavors, well-prepared except for some lamb chops that were tasty but poorly trimmed. A limited and seasonal menu, well curated wine list, and some fun cocktails. We will definitely be back.
Not many spots have been around in Berkeley as long as I have, La Limes is one.  Still lovely ambiance and friendly service.  A limited but excellent menu, one of the best places to eat meat in the east bay.  Fine bar too.
My parents live a block away from Lalime's, so I have been there many times for dinner.  I always thought it was good but not the best for the price. However, we went for the first time in a while a couple nights ago, and the food was amazing.  I think a new chef took over, and boy does that show in the food! My husband had the prix fixe dinner that came with a octopus and calamari salad, a black cod entree, and flan.  We shared oysters and cauliflower, and I had the other black cod entree and the fresh fruit crumble to end the meal. Everything that we had was perfectly cooked.  The flavors were bright and bold without being overpowering.  Lalime's is every bit as good as other new 'trendy' restaurants (probably better), without all the hype.  Service is attentive but not overbearing. What a treat!
I give stars based on the context of the cuisine and the presentation, the whole gestalt of a place. For example: I give Little Star Pizza 5 stars because I'm comparing it to other pizza places. Great space, great service, great food. And CONSISTENCY. I've been there a dozen times and never left disappointed. So, 5 stars, boom.After numerous visits I have to give Lalime's my first 2 star rating. I lived in the area many years ago and ate at Lalime's regularly. I remembered it being good, but I couldn't remember many of the items I enjoyed there. Not a good sign. I remember places from decades ago second after I remember a particularly stellar meal I had there. The meal is what makes me remember the place to begin with.When I moved back to the area I realized I couldn't remember hardly anything I ate at Lalime's all those years back (other than a vague venison and a cake that was cut so that it could be stacked on house-made gelato and had to be toppled to eat it). So I gave it another whirl.Lalime's bills itself as upscale and then delivers on good, but not amazing cuisine. They have an incredible space and nothing was outright bad to eat, but it's just too dressed up for what got put in front of us.It's (relatively) expensive, it's local, and if I could walk into the kitchen and tell them anything it would be, "I don't care if you can balance a piece of asparagus so that it's perpendicular to the plate. I'm here for your cooking skills, not novelty-culinary-landscape architecture"It's not the 90's anymore. I am well over the California cuisine kitsch where ordinary vegetables are cut into amazing origami accents or frog legs get served with a pair of edible loafers. A great restaurant should still be great if the diner's are eating with blindfolds on or on a paper plate with a spork. If you wrapped a burger from Peter Luger's in a piece of wax paper and ate it standing over a fire in a rusty barrel: it would still blow your mind.I should bite something and struggle to identify some of the flavors, how some taste might have been accomplished. The only thing I struggled to understand on this last visit to Lalime's was how my companion's shockingly overcooked hen (it was seriously tough) was so beautifully stacked to remind me of the triangular tone of a Renaissance painting.I had polenta and duck. It came out in a bowl and was the consistency of runny grits. The crackling duck was so crackling that I honestly had to extract and examine a few bites to make sure it wasn't a stray piece of glass. There was no flavor to these dangerous slivers.We started with a brussel sprout appetizer that was genuinely great. I want to love this place. I really do. The ingredients are obviously as good as it gets and the atmosphere is maybe the best in the area, the wine selection is amazing and rotates regularly, but the food just doesn't do it. I somehow know I'll try this place again, maybe a year from now, and I'll have an open mind (again), but it seems likely they'll break my heart just a tiny bit more. Or maybe they'll cut off a piece of it with a chunk of crackling duck.
Terrible.  Walked here because we live just a few hundred meters up the street.  Came for the "social hour" as Lalime's calls it....  had oysters, salad, burger, etc... the oysters were the only worthwhile items.. the rest not well prepared, served, and the burger was dry... could have made a better burger myself.  The worst part of the whole evening was the wedding rehearsal party that was being hosted there... at least 25-30 people seated for the party in the open restaurant.  It was extremely noisy and the event dominated the atmosphere and left our ears ringing.  We are pretty hip and open people who love food, interesting cocktails and great wine... thank goodness this wasn't a special occasion or our anniversary.  We would not recommend this to any Baby Boomers, Gen Xer's or Millennials for a fun Friday evening dinner/happy hour venue.
It's sad when a place you used to love so much and would have given 5 stars changes things just enough to drop it down a couple notches.I agree with some others here.  I went for my fourth or fifth time just a few weeks ago and portions have been cut quite a bit.  Now don't get me wrong, I think smaller portions for entrees are FINE, it leaves room to enjoy all the other things you should at a place like this (appetizers, desserts, etc.)... but they really cut some stuff back.We decided to split a salad.  Previous times, this had been sufficient for 2.  This time, we literally got served such an incredibly small plate each, it was crazy.  It could have been eaten in 4 bites.Same for the dessert... clearly a portion for one and only one.  We got the brownie before and this time it wasn't nearly as good.  The one we had before was clearly home-made, decadent, utterly delicious and this one was... not any of that.Entrees this time didn't seem to live up to previous standards here either.  My seared halibut was a bit too overdone.  Sauce was nothing impressive.  My girlfriend's dinner too was only so so.We remember walking out of here blown away.  Last time, not at all.Though service is still friendly and good, I think we're done with this place.  $100+ for 2 and now I feel I'd need to buy 2 salads and 2 desserts, so next time would be $120 + tax/tip or so?  All to walk out not feeling blown away by the food?Nope.
Service = goodFood = ok. I really enjoyed the sweatbreads. Deep fried and yummy.The steak was cooked nicely, but  the sauce that came with it was a little weird tasting. The fries that came with the steak were really good though. They were cut into bite sized cubes and had the perfect crunch. I was a little disappointed with the strawberry shortcake dessert. It wasn't really a traditional cake. It was a bowl layered with cake on the bottom, creme, then strawberries, then a soft cookie on top. It was good, but I actually wanted a cake .
Had not been to Lalime's for about 10 years.  We brought our good friend and neighbor as a Thank You for taking care of our dog for 3 weeks.  He had not been to Lalime's so he was very pleased to go to a "new place".   Must say, it is still wonderful.  Love the food, service and atmosphere of this gem. The Wine List was excellent and we got a delicious bottle of Old Vine Zin for the table.  We had the Steak, Lamb Chops and Cod.  Clean plates all around by end of the meal.  Dessert was even more impressive.  Thing I love about Lalime's is the use of seasonal vegetables and sustainable meats and fish. There are also wonderful vegetarian dishes.Will definitely go back more often.
A friend and I came here for a senior citizens dinner and stayed till adult dining hour.  Full disclosure: we also drank almost 2 bottles of wine so read with caution.Here's what I did learn about myself though - if there is a greater than $30 delta between the wine I drink, I will hurt the next day.  I should just stick to the cheap stuff. We both ordered the steak - which was delicious and hearty.  We both took large portions home ... hidden underneath potatoes and veggies in order to deter our significant others from eating our leftovers.  There is a lot of pleasure in having left overs to look forward to ... and quite disappointing when you get home, realize someone ate your food and now you have to cook. [To be fair, I never cook ... but I can only imagine how frustrating that would be.]My friend and I are big fans of fries ... they are called French fries on the menu, but don't expect anything long and fry like.  They are more like deep fried potato ball wedges.  Skip dessert.  I ordered the peach tatin but the crust was stale.  Otherwise it was a very lovely meal.
Like other reviewers I was delighted to finhd this lovely restaurant tucked away in a nice neighborhood. The interior decor is simple and attractive, with plenty of space between tables. The noise level is low, so you can hear each other speak without straining or shouting. The service was impeccable and each of the dishes we had was delicious. Prices are reasonable too. I will go again.
I've been dining here occasionally for over ten years.  Last night's dinner was a huge disappointment.  Evidence of massive cost-cutting was rampant.  The menu was totally unappealing, featuring cheap cuts of meat at very high prices (e.g., grilled pork shoulder for $25).  The dessert menu was a joke.  There were literally no cakes or pastries or any kind - only ice cream (Breyers?), sorbet, and puddings.  We figured the pastry check must have quit or been fired.  Our server was pleasant enough, but the restaurant was grossly understaffed, with only two servers for the entire room.  The net result was that everything was very very slow.  One of our entrees went back to the kitchen mostly uneaten.  The server asked about it and was advised that it was just not very good.  There was no apology or adjustment offered.Lalime's is off my list forever.
What can I say about a perfect Friday evening after getting off from a long week of work? Getting a surprise visit with flowers and a stuffed turtle who I've named Pudgy, drinking wine atop a hill with a gorgeous view of the bay, and then coming to Lalime's where you feel like you've been transported to a quaint little restaurant in the countryside, I mean really does it get any better than that? I felt like I was a princess last night. But of course, for those of you who could care less about that, the food was AMAZING.-Fresh sweet water oysters, YUM!-Delicious fried sweetbreads on a bed of sauteed kale, which by the way is probably the best kale i've ever had.-Melt in your mouth, smoothest piece of black cod I've ever had. This dish was ALMOST perfect, except I could have done without the onion and cucumber-Lamb shank was very nice and tender and the rice porridge that accompanied it was absolutely delicious, sort of like a mix between asian porridge and italian risotto.-We ended our meal with a decadent nectarine and grand marnier creme brulee with a very light brulee at the top. I would have liked more brulee but the custard itself was so delicious especially with a nice latte. -We also ordered a bottle of Kings Estate Pinot Noir ~ my very first pinot I tried was from Kings Estate and it was still as good as I remember. I don't think I could have asked for a better evening, especially with the great and attentive servers and waitresses. Smiles all the way home.
It's still probably a five, but there's no more George Morrone.  George is gone -- I have no clue as to whether the separation was initiated by him or by the K2 Restaurant Group.  The new executive chef is Brian White, who has been with K2 for some time.  He paid his dues at Fonda Solana, Sea Salt and then Lalime's.  As you can read on the restaurant's web site:"...Now Brian is excited to take Lalime's into its next phase of culinary delights!"Brian's style of cooking can be described as ingredient driven with a focus on traditional food. He likes to take ideas that have been worked on over the years by chefs and grandmother's alike and to bring them to a new level. He believes each dish should tell a story. He wants for Lalime's to become reacquainted with its statement of being a superb California restaurant that takes local products and creates food that ranges from memorable and satisfying to exciting and innovative."I went to Lalime's for dinner last night and had a perfectly wonderful experience.  The menu has definitely changed, however, and quite a few of George's dishes have disappeared.
Had pleasant corner table made conversation very easy....but arugula salad had large leaf, not small leaf arugula..not the kind monterrey market sells and is much tastier..a clump of overripe of avocado was thrown in with a rather bitter dressing...my steak was lukewarm, and not very rare as ordered. Potatoes were re warmed and mushrooms also.  Didn't send it back because it was family dinner. Desert of crumb cake had large pieces of fruit, not very subtle. Wine and service was fine. First ordered lamb but discovered it was frozen from Australia. Why? Much good lamb from Marin.  No incentive to return after many years, except for glass of wine.
Lovely atmosphere and gracious service for our large party. However be sure to call and confirm your reservation. Because of my party's size, I'd called in but they didn't put it on the books and this was an important business dinner. I must confess I found the appetizers much better than the mains. My lamb shank was thoroughly over-salted and the plate was out of balance: even for a committed carnivore, that large hunk of meat on a trickle of polenta was  daunting. I ate two bites and took the rest home. Will see how the hunk fares tonight with some sidekicks...
I love this restaurant. I always get a consistently excellent meal here.  The portions are just right, and everything tastes wonderful.    I love the decor, and feel like the tables are well-spaced.  I had the squash soup and lamb chops and they were yummy.  My husband had the tartare and filet Mignon, and both were clean-your- plate delicious.  I had the panna cotta which was good, but not that good.  My husband had the bread pudding, which he loved!  The drinks are very delicious.  I thought the prices were very reasonable.  29-39 dollars.  The lamb chops came with chutney and very lightly seasoned cauliflower, along with some yummy greens  that were wonderful!  It reminds me of an being at an excellent restaurant in France.  It's not modern cuisine,instead it's extremely delicious, well-seasoned food.  I'm sure there are restaurants that are considered better, but most of them seem like a hassle to me.   I am not a foodie.  This is more of a restaurant like the  Chez Panisse cafe when it has one of it better chefs.  It's not a concepty restaurant like Gather et al, or an endless priz fix restaurant, like Gary Dankos.  i wish there were more restaurants like this around here.
My elder parents wanted to take me out for my birthday, and I wanted a place that they would be comfortable. Service was perfect, food was excellent. Though the menu was small, everyone enjoyed their meal and found something they liked. I had the fried chicken, which elevated that dish to a whole new level. The mash potatoes and spinach were slightly underwhelming, but the biscuit was great. My dad had the hamburger, and said it was the best he's ever had. My wife had a vegetarian dumplingish thing with accompanying roasted/smoked winterish vegetables, and it was savory and satisfying. Cocktails were good, original, not too weak, not too strong and not too expensive.We ordered two desserts, and they were both excellent.I am only deducting a star a) because the menu was somewhat limited and b) the restaurant is more like an old friend than the hot new kid on the block. i.e., though completely reliable it had only moderate Wow factor. Is that fair? Maybe not.
We decided on this place for a 78th Birthday dinner. The first impression was wonderful. The restaurant has a beautiful style and feel. The decor is modern and warm. Now the bad...Our waiter was emotionless. I even think he may have been an alien in a human body. When we had questions about the menu items, he answered us with our question. Q: WHAT IS A SKIRT STEAK? A: IT'S A STEAK. Really? Q: CAN YOU TELL ME MORE ABOUT THIS WINE? IS IT SIMILAR TO A CAB, MERLOT OR PINOT? A: IT'S A RED WINE. Again, really? Two of us ordered the skirt steak medium rare. When it was served, it was rare. I mean still moo'ing. Hubby ordered the Guinea hen and was pleased with his dish.
I was taken here for dinner over the weekend. My date seemed excited about the place..hence I was pretty stoked to try it, too.I immediately liked the ambiance and the coziness of the restaurant. The only negative vibe I got was that the bar seating is by reservation only and the hostess was quite crabby..That aside, the overall experience was excellent. When I finally was ble to take my eyes off my date..and onto the menu..I saw a number of things I wanted to try..(of course..my eyes always bigger than my appetite)I believe the highlight was the Habanero infused tuna tartare...it was a healthy portion but even then we had to have a second plate...We had a nice bottle of Au Bon Climate pinot to complement our deliciuos meal..The bartender was very personable..and the other patrons were seemingly friendly locals. Definitely a place I'd revisit and recommend to F&amp;F...
Classy: yesCrowded: yesCrab/Shrimp lettuce wrap: excellentBeef tartar: okayGoat cheese/beet salad: excellentFried chicken: just okay ( I like Popeye's better), actually slightly over priced for the way it tasted ($20!)Pork chop: goodBurger: goodCoffee Crunch cake: excellentBlack and White Pudding: goodOver all:  been there ate it
good food. fair service. would only go back if someone else suggested it
The food was good .The soup that we have ordered wasn't any good at all.The portion were too little and it is kind of pricy for what you eat.I was still hungry....had appetizer ,main dish and desert but i had to eat a lots of bread to feel a bit full.I am not a heavy person who needs so much food ,don't get it wrong,i am actually petite but the portion were too little.The staff were nice though.I would like to go back but if i am ready to pay as much i expect not to stay hungry!
Some of the best food &amp; service I have had since moving to Berkeley. And I'm a horrible snob. We've been to Lalime's twice, and although both visits were long enough ago for my absent-minded brain to forget the details of everything we ate, the food was excellent, the wine was excellent, and the service was excellent. They had no problems fitting us in although we hadn't made reservations very far in advance (like, maybe 20 minutes in advance) and the restaurant was pretty crowded both times. I do recall some small but amazing rack of lamb. The restaurant is beautiful and although street parking can be iffy, we didn't have too much trouble either time. Lalime's is very high on my short list of "nice places to eat" in Berkeley.
I'd like to give Lalime's 4.5 stars but I rounded up because they seemed like they treat customers well. The waiter was very strong from doing a good job opening an old bottle of wine to the appropriate level of passion for specific dishes to handling a mistake in the kitchen. The appetizers were all strong. The sweetbreads were very good and the calamari preparation was excellent. The lamb entree was tasty but the chicken was even better. Entrees small portions for the price. Next time, I might go with two appetizers rather than appetizer and entree.
What a disappointment!  3 people - 6pm reservation. Extremely slow service. When we finally got our food it was different then on the menu. The seafood salad stated that it included uni(sea urchin roe) but where was the uni? Never to be seen or tasted. We were told that it was in the vinagrette. I was delivered not at all what I had ordered which was Trumpet Mushrooms with hand made pappardelli. I was serviced spaghettini with one quarter Trumpet Mushroom and peas but no pappardelle. When I conplained I was told that they had run out of the pappardelli (at 6 pm?). So they whipped me up a new dish not on the menu and served it to me without informing me. Then they seemed amazed that I noticed the difference. We will not be back___ever!
Good Food (Not Great!)  Horrible, Horrible Service!We made reservations and were seated promptly.  The menu had some interesting dishes, but it was rather limited for my taste.  We ordered our drinks and then proceeded to order our appetizer dish and entree.  Our food came out it a reasonable amount of time, but we NEVER saw our waitress again!  We finished our meal and had to get the manager's attention just to get our check!  She apologized and said that the waitress wasn't feeling well. (Although we saw her buzzing around tables in another area of the restaurant)  I think it will be a while before we consider coming back as there are other restaurants more than eager for our patronage and willing to work for it! Oh and BTW, unless you're familiar with the neighborhood, don't bother!  You won't find a place to park on the street and if you do, you may get lost in the dark trying to find your vehicle!
This review marks my descent into Full on Angry Yelper.  I'm pissed off at Lalime's, sure.  I hate this kind of restaurant.  The service sucked.  But not in a singular "oh my waiter is having an off night" kind of way.  Instead, it was the "we don't promote an atmosphere of respect for the diners as a matter of company policy" sort.  (There's no front of the house guy coaching these servers into a form commensurate with the image this restaurant is trying to project.)  Skylar's behavior reflected his name--he was somewhere else tonight, far beyond this galaxy.And, yes, the food sucked.  I'm fine with the fact that it's dated and boring.  That's how they sell themselves.  This kind of food can be really good.  What I can't stand is that they clearly just... lost their minds.  My halibut (with Tahini, Chermoula, Eggplant puree, roasted peppers, and on and on) seemed like a dish invented by a college kid cutting and pasting from their google searches.  Mediterranean key words, please.  It was gross.  Dear chef, your dishes were bad.  They weren't just badly cooked, but badly conceived.  My night ends with me hoping that your quarter-century run will end with a decline into bankruptcy.  Then you can blame it on the recession and move on.  Why so bitter?  Because the level of contempt for the diner is palpable.  You can feel it.  This place has given up, but they still want to take as much money as possible before the realization sets in.But mostly I'm upset with my fellow yelpers.  What the hell?  We just moved back to Berkeley for the year and we're trying to take your advice on places to eat.  This place is a joke.  Please message me.  Tell me why I'm wrong.  At least some conviction would restore my faith in the collective wisdom of humanity.  I would rather be wrong than hopelessly disillusioned.
My real rating is 3.5 stars. The food here is great. Last night we had the steak, a warm spinach salad, oysters, some kind of cauliflower dish, and a pasta dish.  Everything was cooked perfectly and tasted great. On food quality and taste alone, I'd give it a 5.  Now the downside... the service is just a bit "frazzled".  It doesn't have the feel of a well-oiled machine, but rather the feel of a bunch of new people hustling to do their jobs.  Hard to explain... and I'm not even sure the staff are new, they just don't seem to have a smooth rhythm. Our bill was confused with another table and they ended up charging my card twice (hopefully that will be resolved!). Also, the menu indicated that the warm spinach salad was accompanied by a quail egg - but the egg that showed up was a standard chicken egg.  Not a BIG deal, but if the menu says quail egg, it should be a quail egg (or at least pointed out when the item is ordered). When I asked if the egg was a quail egg, the waitress said "oh no, we are out, that's a regular egg so you're really getting more bang for your buck."  If bang for my buck was what I wanted that night, I probably wouldn't have been at Lalime's! And we were one of the earliest tables seated that night, so I doubt they had any quail eggs to begin with. Last night there was just a bit of something lacking in the management and/or "flow" scheme. I'm holding them to a pretty high standard because their prices are quite high, so the entire experience should be excellent.  Food = excellent. Service = so/so.
The appetizers were generously portioned and well plated, and the fish main course was absolutely spot on perfectly done. Service seemed a little busy, and it took a bit to get our meal out during the dinner rush, but we will definitely be back soon.
That's 4.51 stars.  Tonight we had dinner at Lalime's for the first time in years.  We were celebrating having met 32 years ago.  I'm not sure why it's been so long since we were here.  We've always liked it and have been dining here practically since it opened.  It's homey and elegant at the same time.We were greeted and seated by Cindy Krikorian.  While she took Alan to the table I went to the restroom.  There are two large unisex restrooms.  They are clean and attractive, but my favorite touch was the sign over the sink w/ the words spelled out in Scrabble tiles:  WASH YOUR HANDS.  Because I'm less mobile these days she seated us at a table at the top of the stairs, which I appreciated.We looked at the many tempting things on the menu and negotiated what we wanted.  We started w/ warm olives w/ thin strips of orange zest, garlic and rosemary.  Warm bread and rolls w/ butter were brought to the table.  The bread and the olives were very tasty.  We were offered more bread but declined because we would have eaten that too.  Next we had ordered white ale steamed mussels w/ buttermilk fried onion rings and garlic aioli.  The first order arrived room temperature.  They were tasty, but small.  We looked for our server but couldn't see her.  The bartender noticed us looking and not eating and came over to ask what was wrong.  We told her and she whisked them away.  Our server returned w/ another order, which was warmer, bu they were still small.  That happens w/ mussels.  I've been to the same restaurant on different occasions and sometimes the mussels are plump and sweet and other times they're small and wizened.  When our server checked back w/ us we told her they were warmer, but just OK.  She said she would take them off the bill.  We appreciated that, a lot.  We didn't finish them.  Cindy came over, looked at them regretfully and apologized.  Service was stellar in general and particularly in deaing w/ the disappointing mussels.For our mains Alan ordered roasted chanterelles and 'hen of the woods' mushrooms.  It was supposed to come w/ polenta, but he substituted roasted cauliflower.  I ordered the grilled hanger steak, which came w/ roasted  mushroom and oxtail jus and braised Bloomsdale spinach.  Everything was delicious!  I tasted a bite of Alan's cauliflower and a mushroom and gave him bites of my steak, which was medium rare as ordered.  You know how sometimes what you order is just what you wanted?  That was my steak.  It was perfection.  I had a glass of syrah and he had a Chimay.  We were so satisfied w/ our dinner that we weren't even tempted by dessert.  It was a lovely meal.
Came upon this restaurant on a business Friday night with no reservations, but were graciously seated by one of the owners (who was manning the front desk) within 5 minutes.  The proprietors of the restaurant are very much a part of its operation, at the front and also on the floor.The food was good -- fresh ingredients with bold flavors.  We ordered the mushroom bisque (which was average), steamed mussels with onion rings (delicious but the mussels were on the small side), the BBQ pork belly burger (which my husband loved), and the shellfish stew (very hearty and great flavors).  And we thought the prices were all very reasonable for the quality of food.Overall, we had a great dining experience and will definitely be back.
Lalime's is a stylish place that gives the feel of a supper club.  You are warmly greeted at the door by a pretty hostess who brings you to the main dining room and proceeds to offer you your choice of available tables.  Service can be a bit distracted but does get the job done.  The menu is upscale californian.  An amuse of broccoli soup with some bacon bits was spot-on.  Deep taste of broccoli accented by the salty pork.  Pear salad with endive, walnuts and goat cheese was a second winner, if a bit hard to deconstruct and actually eat.  The sweet pear was perfectly offset by the endive and goat cheese and the nuts added textural interest. An appetizer of scallops kept the winning streak going.  The scallops were perfectly seared and fresh.  They came over an english pea puree and were contrasted by citrus fruit.  A main course of trout was nice.  The fish was sweet and fresh and the potatoes and seared asparagus that came with the fish were also nice, although the fish was a bit overpowered by an astringent garnish.  Also, one stalk of asparagus was tough and inedible and a spine of bones topped the fish as it had not been fully boned.  Ah, perfection had run its course.  But while this plate wasn't perfect to my jaded taste it was very good.I left feeling quite good about life.
Mary received a $100 gift certificate to this restaurant and so we made a night of it.  Great ambience and great food.  A little on the expensive side, so good for special occasions.We ordered a mussles appetizer and it was the best I've ever had.  Their white wine, garlic sauce was so good, after we ate all the mussels we asked for bread so we could sop up all the sauce.I ordered a steak dish and she ordered a black ink pasta dish.  Steak was good, nothing spectacular about it, Mary's pasta dish wasn't to my liking.  Portions were too small.Overall would like to go back and try it again someday, but not dying to go back.
Dined here last night with my family and party of 6, including two extremely lovable children. I was pleased to see they offer a sustainable and partly organic menu, although no vegan and hardly no vegetarian options. Everything was delicious and drinks from the bar and desserts were superb (although service became slow and dirty dishes piled up a bit). We had the lavender creme brule and the coffee crunch cake =). They also kindly accommodated a special request for plain butter noodles for the kids. Be sure to try the fried potatoes and aioli sauce!Thanks Lalime's!
Nothing on the entree menu but small chunks or large chunks of meat, i.e., quasi-French. Such chunks of meat were mostly bland / boring / unremarkable, with the exception of the quail appetizer, which was yummy. Noise level was high enough that we gave up trying to speak to anyone but the person immediately next to us. (Noise was encouraged by the restaurant design -- hard flat walls and ceiling.) Decor was nothing special. Service was very good (thus, two stars rather than one), and we did end spending a long time there (speaking to the person immediately next to us.)For the price, not recommended.
I had a $100 gift certificate to this place so decided to try it out. While the mussels were AWESOME, the rest of the dishes were just OK. The pasta was too salty, as well as the steak.Service was great but at this price, I expect every dish to be spot on... sorry Lalime's but you didn't live up to the hype. I am very grateful for the free meal though!
I have been coming here for years and have always loved the food.  This time around the service started off well enough, but then we ended up waiting 20 minutes for our burgers to arrive.  It was as though our food server forgot about us.  Once the food did arrive,  the burgers were all well done when we asked for medium.  Thankfully, they were so delicious that it didn't matter.  But come on people...why bother asking us how we want it cooked if you're not going to follow through? Perhaps it was just an off night.  Perhaps our server stopped caring because we weren't a 'big ticket' table.  Who knows.  Next time I'll let them know my thoughts instead of bitching about it on Yelp.  I want this restaurant to be great.
We went last night for a special birthday dinner and the experience was wonderful. The service was spot on (though no one will ever beat Aaron's legacy). The food was remarkable. We split the beet, goat cheese, and hazelnut salad. We shared the pickled vegetables (all great except for the overly smoked cucumbers, the cucumbers need a hint of smoke nit as much as they had, but what a GREAT idea). The frites were a dream dipped in that wonderfully garlicky aioli... We ordered the duck and the braised lamb. The duck was perfect and we both agreed it rivaled any we've had anywhere on the planet. I suppose some would complain the lamb was too salty, however, it reminded me of those glorious bits of delectable crust on a roast. We opted out of dessert as we had Belgian chocolates awaiting us at home. My only complaint has nothing to do with the restaurant and rather with my fellow Berkeley residents, do you really have to wear your Cal hoody, your keys rattling on their chain, and then get up during  your meal to take silver wear off a neighboring table when you drop yours? I have lived here my whole life and I love some of our informalities, that said a degree of respect and a touch of decent table manners would go along way.
I am so sorry to report this, but I had the WORST meal here last night. This place is an old neighborhood fav, but the salmon was half-cooked and garnished with a big mound of raw parsley, my artichoke dish was bitter, and there was so much salt in these dishes and the corn soup that I have a major headache today. Finally, the chocolate cake was small and dry. The service was fine, although somewhat harried? When we expressed dismay over the salmon, it was whisked away without a word and no further discussion. The nice hostess insisted that keeping the doors and windows open was pleasant, when it was uncomfortably cold. Very expensive at $150 with tip for two diners yet completely sub-par. Not sure what is up, but we are taking a loonnnnggg break until better times return to Lalime's.
Lalime's is a generally high-quality, upscale neighborhood restaurant with an inviting, comfortable ambiance.  I want to give it 4 stars, but their inconsistency prevents it.  One or two meals here have been excellent, but the rest have been disappointing, and one in particular was poor.  Amateur mistakes occasionally detract from the experience, and the food often lacks that polished, memorable quality you expect (and get) from Lalime's peer restaurants in the area like Rivoli.  The staff are generally serviceable and friendly, but not operating at the level you'd expect from a great restaurant.I like Lalime's more than the 3 stars would indicate, but their inconsistency hurts them in my eyes.  You never know if you're going to have a great meal here or just an average one.
Lalimes is tucked-away in what must be the cutest commercial district in Berkeley.  It is small, warm, and the folks that work there are extremely service oriented.Since we only wanted small plates, we consulted our friendly and knowledgeable bartender, Jen, on beverage and menu options.  She made us a fantastic ginger-liqueur beverage to start with while we pondered the menu.  We finally decided, with Jen's help, to mosey our way from the spicy to savory to sweet: George's Tuna Tartare came first and the presentation was amazing - I was even indulged my request for a Christmas tree shaped tartare!  Next came the cheese plate.  I was so pleased with the cheese and fruit pairings that my feet wouldn't stop dancing on the bar stool.  And then... the vanilla lavender poached pear came.  There is nothing better than a dessert that pleases more than your tastebuds.  I almost wanted to smell this beauteous wonderment more than I wanted to eat it, but I was glad I took the dive.  Paired with a beautiful port, this was the best end to a lovely dining experience.It would be blasphemy to not share the loveliness that is Lalimes.  Bring a friend!
Really like this place.
Yes, the menu is a tad pricey, but this place is great for special occasions. Went here for my mom's birthday. She is already a fan of the restaurant in addition to its sister restaurants (Fonda, T-Rex, Sea Salt etc.) and was impressed and satisfied as always with the food and service. The ingredients were inventive and fresh. Between our table we had the strawberry and fresh greens salad, warm olives, the nero black pasta, salmon, and for dessert the pecan sundae. all of which were delicious. the pasta was a little strange in appearance, but i fell in love at first bite. love the decent portions and seasonal menu. wish i could afford it more often.
Lalimes is a neighborhood gem.  Dinner last night was excellent, as always, and our waiter could not have been nicer or more professional.  Sweetbreads are always on the appetizer menu, and they are done really well.  The owners are usually visible - it is so nice to support this family run operation.  A gift certificate to Lalimes for $100 is a favorite present.  The wine list is reasonably priced, and $100 buys a very nice dinner for two, with wine.  We will come back many more times.
WWW (wine without women) gathered for our 8th anniversary dinner at the place where it all began with the wine we began with, Zinfandel.We focused on one vineyard, Ridge, and the wines like dinner shined.No matter what people may think or write about George Morrone his cooking shines and the food at Lalimes has clearly stepped up a big notch.  We started in 1989, the Zinfandel, a bit thin was still quite alive and our server and the chef shared a glass with us.The meal started with an amuse, a lemony (meyer?) cold potato soup and into the recommended "George's ahi tuna tartare, habanero infused sesame oil, Asian pear, pine nuts and mint".  Mixed at the table into two helping triangles it delivered.  We felt, on the other hand, that the lobster roll got lost.The evening dissolved into the usual banter about work wives and the sad state of bay area sports.  My New York steak was dead on, served in a peppery balsamic jus with a sort of tasting plate of chantrelles, mashed potatoes and chard.  Really good portions.  Neighboring Venison chops looked quite substantial and were well paired against the Zins, we had moved into the 2000's by now.Service was professional and understated, as it should be.Can't really remember the desserts but they gave us chocolates on the way out and I walked home a happy guy.Do yourself a favor, go enjoy the place.  It has very little to do with the past, throw your old expectations out and do not pass up the Ahi.It is going to give Rivoli run for best North Berkeley/Albany neighborhood haunt.I will be going back.
Lalime's is impressive! I come here every few months for a special occasion, and love that the menu changes between each visit. We are greeted immedietly and kindly everytime we arrive (and we do make reservations to ensure no wait). The service has always been fantastic, as well as the food. I am vegan, and it can be very difficult to find items to eat (especially nice restaurants like Lalime's where the menu isn't that extensive). However, the waitors are always willing to work with me, offering suggestions, etc. They are so helpful and I don't even need to ask. For example, on our most recent visit the waitor visited our table and mentioned the dessert options, then looked directly at me and said "and we do have this item that is vegan". A lot of the times I feel like I am a hastle to deal with, but Lalime's makes me feel at home, no matter what my dietary needs are. They are willing to easily customize things for me, without me having to remind them!I started with the salad, which was fantastic. The waitor knew to hold off on the cheese and crutons. We also ordered the potatoes, which are probably the best potatoes I have ever had. Perfectly crisp on the outside and soft on the inside. They have so much flavor, so watch out, they are VERY addicting. I then had the Chickpea Crepes with Grilled Squash, no yogurt. Oh my word, was this dish fantastic! Everything was cooked perfectly, and the crepes were filled with curried potatoes of some sort. My portion was also the largest portion out of everyone at the table. Last time I was there they made some sort of vegetarian dish for me, and it too was fantastic. Lots of flavors and I remember thinking that vegetables don't always taste this good (and I eat a lot of them!). For dessert I had an apricot champagne sorbet that the waitor suggested, also fantastic. The non-vegans at the table also loved their dishes. The black fettucine is a favorite (sweet lettuces) and the fish was well liked. They are said to have a way with seafood. They also have great wines.Yes, lalimes is pricey, but it is meant to be a nice restaurant to come to for a nice occasion (not an everyday place!). We come here when family members are in town, for holidays, birthdays, etc. It is like other nice restaurants in that the portions aren't huge and at first glance may be dissapointing. I hate to admit it but our American standards are very high, so its something that I need to get over. I always end up overeating, anyway!  However, I would most likely leave hungry if I only ordered an entree, so make sure to grab an appetizer as well. Then you're set.The atmosphere is very nice inside. I love the sun room that you walk into, and I love the way the dining area is designed. Its very comfortable, the lighting is great, and for some reason its one of those restaurants where I really don't notice that other people are dining in the same room.The food is fantastic, packed with flavor, and the service is always fantastic. I recommend this place for any special event or a very nice dinner. And yes, there is always an option for vegetarians/vegans! They will work with you.
This is our local go to place for special events (birthdays, anniversaries, something good happens).  The food is consistently great, the service is great, and we love the casual yet classy atmosphere.  Compares very well to much fancier places we've been in my opinion.
All of the food we ordered was delicious.  Perhaps the best meal I have ever had.  All five of us were raving about our food from the lamb chops to the steak pommes frites, cod, and the fried chicken.  My daughter said her salad was the best she has ever tasted. The staff were all welcoming and helpful and the ambiance was lovely.  We will definitely be back!
We go to Lalimes on average once a year or so.    Usually we've liked the place.   They have a *very* limited menu, but usually there's at least one thing that we're excited about to order.      Tonight we read the menu, found the main courses unappealing, so each ordered a small dish, planning on ordering one of the delicious-looking desserts on the other side of the menu.     Appertisers were indeed delicious, but then the waitress brought the dessert menu.    No resemblance between any of the 3 desserts on her menu and  any of the 6 desserts offered on the back side of the main menu.    We had a 6:15 reservation, so there's no way they could have run out of anything; presumably they just hadn't bothered to notice.     We might have felt differently about this had the management or waitress seemed to care about this.   But they didn't;  who cares if we printed the wrong menu, they seemed to be saying.   Complete indifference.Based on the review by Mary V, of Sept 1, this is clearly a pattern.    The management couldn't care less.       Extremely disappointing.    Lalime's in the old days was a wonderful restaurant that took pride in customer service.     Now it's part of a conglomerate, multiple restaurants under a bit corporate umbrella, sort of Gourmet AT&amp;T.
The food is well prepared with fresh ingredients and not too salty.   The staff are friendly and courteous, willing to explain the menu or provide recommendations on food and wine.   We come here about every other month as it's one of our favorite restaurants in the Berkeley area.
Tucked away in a more quieter part of Gilman Street in Berkeley, Lalime is easily missed by the non-local.  Inside is a unique two-level layout of what seems to be a convered garage/living room, but done in a charming way.  It is uscale dinning with out the upscale attire required and a staff that is more than accomodating when needing to attend a local event.  Each dish was enjoyable in it's own right and with our limited time, we opted for several appetizers rather than adding a main course.  We both really enjoyed the Crisped Sweetbreads with porcini mushrooms and cream, as well as the Grilled sardines covered with guindilla vinaigrette.  The dessert takes the cake, litterally!  I did like the idea of foie gras in the mini kobe burger, but I've had bigger and better for the same price.  The Warm chocolate fondant cake was amazing, not too sweet with a bit of a salty edge to it.  The Creamy frozen strawberry soufflé was good, but just not as good as the fondant cake. Having missed the main dishes and a large portion of the menu, we are planning a return visit for more culinary exploration.
Lalime is the gem of Berkeley.  It serves delicious and creative dishes in a cozy and unpretentious enviroment. The dishes are reasonably priced in light of its quality and quantity.  It is great place for casual gathering as well as special occasions.
The food was excellent.  The pork dish was very tasty.  And it has a very cozy atmosphere.  It's a great place for an unhurried romantic dinner.  The service was also great - very attentive without being intrusive.
Been years since I'd had dinner here. Still quaint, still great seasonal food, still nice mix of foodie diners. Service was really nice but sometimes a little off, but a nice dinner all in all.
Excellent meal! I just went for my birthday dinner and everyone was extremely impressed. Everything was delicious but the pork chop dish, collard greens, &amp; sweetbreads were exquisite. This is the perfect place for a special gathering.
The experience we had last night at Lalime's was not very impressive.  The service was really lacking.  It took more than 15 minutes to have our order taken, another 15 to get the first course and almost 30 minutes to get the second course.  Water glasses were never refilled.  We asked for the wine list to order a second bottle and although that was brought right away it was a very long time before she came back to take the order.  Someone kept turning the lights up and down, which was annoying.  There were two large parties so perhaps they were unstaffed but I won't go out of my way (from the Peninsula) to dine there again.  Lastly, the server never asked about our food - which was the only thing decent about the experience.
Lalime's has offered good, solid Chez Panisse-style cuisine for many years (I'm thinking since the late 1980's or early 90's). Our family has often used Lalime's for special occasions like birthdays or graduations, and we've never been disappointed.Somehow time slipped by, and we hadn't been to visit Lalime's for at least five years. Then, tonight, our stomachs couldn't wait for our 9:30 pm dinner reservation at Gary Danko's restaurant...and we remembered Lalime's. Instead of a four course meal at  our bedtime at Danko's, at Lalime's we were regaled with:First Course: Foie Gras with Reduction sauce and a very simple salad with a lemony dressingSecond Course: Rack of Lamb in a tomato sauce (Lalime's has a wonderful Mediterranean/Armenian influence in its lamb dishes); Tuna tartare with fresh pepper salsa and avocadoThird Course: we shared a cheese plate of cow's milk, sheep's milk, and goat's milk cheese with fig jam and whole grain breadFourth Course: Huckleberry pie a la mode; chocolate creme brulee with black tea ice cream.With this: glass of Sonoma merlot; big bottle of mineral water; black tea: total for the four courses, bevies, tax and tip: $120!Lovely server, young but knowledgeable. She was working too many tables, but her warmth and friendlliness won us over.Oh well, so we missed out on finally eating at Gary Danko's...but we were very happy with our meal at Lalime's for a much reduced price.
Ehhhhh this restaurant is pretty terrible.  It started out okay.  We ordered mussels with garlic toast, pizzetta, cold smoked salmon, and cheese platter to start out with.  They give you a lot for mussels, it's almost an entree portion.  Pizzetta was perfect in every way - they use gruyere with arugula lightly tossed in olive oil. Mmm!!  Smoked salmon was so fresh and flavorful, and the cheese platter had piave cheese, which is my favorite. They're all around $10/dishIt was the entrees that were so disappointing.  One of us ordered mushroom stroganoff despite their own bartender's warning that he can make it better, and of course, it was pretty horrible. I ordered white seabass, which was served on top of brussel sprouts, which was so bad. urgh. My boyfriend ordered pork chops, which was so whatever, too. Entress are less than $27, so not as expensive as people make it sound to be.For dessert, I couldn't find peaches and cream that everyone was talking about, so i got sorbet instead, which was 2 scoops of cranberry (tart and good), and spiced apple (didn't like - but i'm not a fan of cinnamon). We also ordered pumpkin pie, which was so mediocre. Their coffee was okay...They do have quite a bit of wine collection, and we definitely enjoyed our wine that we finished 2 bottles. Maybe we needed that much alcohol to keep ourselves from getting cranky from bad food. Their service is pleasant but slow, their decor is intimate but nothing special.  Overall, I recommend yelping for a different restaurant to go if you want to try something new.
mmmmmm....... reallllly overpriced. the first time i went, the food was pretty good. i had the ridiculously huge pork chop which was cooked perfectly and packed with flavor. i forget what it came with because it was so long ago, but i think it was mashed potatoes or maybe polenta. they had some kind of mixed berry tart for dessert which was tasty as well.since i had a good experience the first time i opted to come here for my birthday a few years back. the food was completely different this time, my pork chop was bland and tough and came with equally bland lentils or something. my parents, who have been cooking since forever and owned their own fine dine and wine restaurant were completely disappointed with their dishes and how much they were paying for it. i'll give it a solid 3 since the first time was good, but i think it's just another overpriced and overhyped berkeley establishment. i won't be back =[
Went there last night, had a wonderful dinner - Chef George Morrone is fantastic!  There were 4 of us, we had the lamb, pork and swordfish, all were magnificent.We also had the toro appetizer and lobster appetizer - which were lovely.Only complaint  I had was that we had to constantly ask for our water glasses to be filled.Otherwise all of the food was delicious.As far as others mentioning the portions? The portions were pretty decent, in my opinion.Thanks Chef George Morrone - we will be back!
The atmosphere, service and food was amazing.  This restaurant is hidden in a residential neighborhood, but each dish was perfect.  The perfect portions, the perfect combinations of flavor, and all of the wait staff were friendly and attentive.  It's a bit pricey, but very reasonable compared to other upscale restaurants.  And the food is worth it!  I can't wait for another excuse to go to this restaurant!
First, our cocktail order did not come until after our cheese course. Then our main courses arrived and I has to ask for the wine to be served that we ordered. My fish stew was ordinary and there were were no mussels in the mussel shells. The waiter never returned to pour more wine once he opened the bottle. He brought desert menus and when I asked what the chocolate with mint clouds were he did not know what it was. I ordered the plum pudding with sorbet. The waiter said he did not like the sorbet (it was good) but the pudding was cold and dry. A very disappointing experience.
Took Lisa for her birthday to Lalime's and we were very impressed.  Pleasant upscale restaurant with wonderful and delicately flavored dishes.We started with the King of Salmon Tartare not knowing what it was and finding out it was delicious!  Small raw salmon pieces mixed in with avocado and lemon juice, nicely molded with 4 crisps on the side and two mini radishes that were salted.  Flavor bomb!The mixed green salad was good, but up against the tartare, it was no match.  Shaved radishes, greens, goat cheese, baby carrots, with a delicate dressing.  I was impressed that they did not drown the greens in dressing.Followed by the main dish: rack of lamb served with a beet green pesto and white beans with chopped brocolini.  Great combination of flavors put together by the pesto.We ordered a side of collard greens with delicious salty cubes of bacon.  Yummy!  Bacon is indeed the heroin of meats.Ended with a wonderfully light and chocolcaty dessert, the floating chocolate island.Definitely worth the price!
Lalimes believes in the adage that less is more.  I'd give this 5 stars but the portions were too small.  I ordered carrot ginger soup and I'm guessing it was a 4 oz. portion.  The ravioli entree had 3-4 raviolis, with a portion of an asparagus stalk (sliced) and a 3 -4 small mushrooms (sliced) (definitely not worth $18).  The rack of lamb had only two small pieces.  The side of fries helped and was creatively prepared and fried (kind of reminded me of hush puppies), but was small as well.  Desserts were small.  Otherwise, everything was quite tasty.  I just wish I had more.  More is more.
Lalime's is in a cool "building".  Its like you are eating in someone's craftsman home.  I love the vibe (very comfortable and non-pretentious), and the waitstaff are well trained and very nice.The food is very good.  Not great, but very good.  My only real complaint is that the menu feels conservative and expected.  For a restaurant with a great chef and reputation (not to mention fairly expensive), I expected the menu to be more inspired.  The food was very good, but compared so some of the other higher end places in East Bay (Rivoli, Chez Panisse Cafe, Citron), they play it safe.  Great for non adventurous people with expensive taste.
Very cool ambiance, beautiful place, very serene. I was stopping for a glass of wine to start my evening. As I was sitting a the bar I could see the food passing by and it looked too apealing so I had to try some.Amazing food, very happy.Can't wait to take my wife there to have diner.Great stuff.Cheers
I hadn't been to Lalimes in many years but was there last weekend for dinner with friends.  I enjoyed the experience plenty but there were two issues.  To start, the place is nicely put together and though the tables are kinda close, it still has a very good atmosphere and you don't have to listen to your neighbor's conversations.Started with a basil gimlet that was very refreshing and not as sweet as they made it sound (by adding simple syrup).  We all shared the beef tongue appetizer which, when paired with the bread, perfectly poached egg and greens was simply really good.First complaint, I had the crab and avocado cocktail and though each ingredient was good, the way ti was served, in a narrow semi-tall glass, you couldn't eat them together.  First eat the crab, then the avocado.  Disappointing.  The other appetizers, salad, anchovy platter, etc. looked fine and I heard no complaints.Main course for me was the maple glazed fried chicken which was plentiful, enough on plate that I didn't finish it, coupled with a small mac and cheese that was creamy goodness and some sauteed broccoli rabe; don't know what that was doing on my plate.  The chicken was moist, crust was crunchy, though I would have liked a little more maple taste.  Overall a very successful dish.  The other plates, prime rib, lamb chops and fish all looked good and were gobbled up with no complaints.The second complaint was the one dessert which, though I didn't have any, apparently was an unpuffed puff pastry so it was hard; the strawberries and cream looked good.  When the issue was raised about the puff pastry, the server was nice enough to offer any other dessert and took the one we had off the bill.Overall, service was really good, food was really good, one small issue of presentation and one issue of puffery otherwise I would have popped it up to a five start.  Do know, it ain't cheap.
This place has never let me down!On very short notice, the wife and I were able to come in and sit at the bar. The bartender was fantastic, letting us try several wines as well as letting us sample an appetizer before we ordered it.The best thing about Lalime is that they have consistently served very solid food. Over the last couple of years we have been here usually with large gaps of time in between and they are always top notch.If in the east bay a must try....
A very nice meal in a quiet neighborhood in north Berkeley. We started with the summer lettuces and butter beans. For the main we shared the skirt steak and salmon. The food tasted very good but i think the bottle of wine was the best. It was a pinot noir from carneros in the $50 range. Service was excellent. Our server carried a bright smile and gave us just the right amount of attention.
We have dined at LaLime's for years.  This is the second year we have gone to celebrate the holidays with our friend.  The food and service is consistently good with attentive service.  If you like ginger try the Fred &amp; Ginger cocktail it warms on a cool evening.  Our friend is very wine savvy and he liked the wine choices and the chardonnay he selected.
Lalime's is not the kind of restaurant to go to if you're hungry; it's more of an arty-farty food-with-pretentions restaurant. Unfortunately, whilst the ambiance and service are in line with the aspirations of the place, the food fails to be as distinctive or as classy as the owners / chefs would like it to be, and it doesn't merit the hefty prices they charge.I had roast pumpkin soup as a starter, and then North African-style prawns (actually an appetizer) for my main dish. The pumpkin soup was disappointing; it lacked any distinguishing taste and wasn't hot (I don't think the soup bowl was warmed before the soup was dished out). The prawns were much better, with a subtle spiced flavour, but were let down by being served on what appeared to be a bed of oily and tasteless pepper antipasto. I tried a little of the pizzetta that one of my friends ordered (he offered it around as he didn't like it), but that was also bland.None of the desserts appealed to me, but I did try a little of a friend's raspberry infused goo (not sure exactly what it was!), which was very tasty.On the plus side, the service was fine, and the bread and water were replenished regularly. The staff also didn't seem to mind that our party stayed and talked for a while after the rest of the diners had left.My experience has been that price is very rarely proportional to the caliber of the dish, and Lalime's certainly fits the high price-low satisfaction model. I cannot comment on all their offerings, but certainly those that I tasted were nothing special.Not recommended.
I have been eating at Lalimes my entire life, litterally, I loved Chef Steve Jaramillo and once he left it went all down hill. All of my favorite servers quit when Chef George came on and when I finally got the chance to eat there it was completely different and not in a good way. Lalimes is not the restaurant that I was once in love with and inspired me to become a chef. They served cold sides with hot entrees and my pork chop looked like they cut it with a saw. My dads steak was covered in this alful burnt red wine sauce that destroyed the natural flavor of the steak. I have not been back to Lalimes since and am not sure I will go back, where I used to be an employee of Lalimes for a summer when I was home from college and would eat there once a month. Change is not always good and when it comes to changing something that has been so amazing and unique for so long I would don't do it. Chef Steve Jaramillo was extremely talented and him leaving Lalimes was a tradegy.
The evening was an absolute train wreck. The most inept, unprofessional and appalling service (replete with complimentary attitude) this ex fine dining veteran waiter/cook and bartender has experienced this side of Podunk. Our main courses took an hour to arrive. During that time and the whole evening for that fact our waiter never visited the table nor poured one ounce of our wine (which our esteemed guests from L.A. commented on several times)The food was mediocre; sadly overcooked sea bass and an undercooked fatty, thin cut of  "Angus' steak @ $26,  which I sent back twice.The wife had the mussels appetizer as an entree which she deemed as; "just okay".Attention:  Medium Rare is not Black 'n' Blue or Rare or when you cannot get it right be served to a customer Well Done, ala..."it serves you right for being such a pain".No one thought or offered to perhaps "begin again" with a new piece of meat. My guests had, of course, finished their meals by the time mine finally arrived. They had also wanted to send back their sea bass, disappointed that it had been ruined, cooked well past that  "just right" texture and doneness that one is accustomed to in establishments of this level. After my meat problems, they thought better and just tucked in, accepting their punishment like good scoutsThe hostess, in the interim apologized to me and said, like I was just off the boat or something, that, "here, we cook our steaks to the rare side". I told her I had still ordered it cooked Medium Rare and it came back Very Rare, two times. She said she would not charge me for the fatty gristle I would soon be presented with and expected to eat. Who cares? She acted as if that empty, hand-wringing gesture had fixed everything. I came for an excellent dinner as promised by their reputation; not charity and an insult to my palate and evening.One of the first skills you learn how to do as a chef or line cook, no matter where you work is... meat "temperature".As a starter I had the corn chowder, which was anything but. A spoonful of corn flavored cream topped with some cold, uncooked "nibblets"; totally unrealized and awful. The breaded, fried green tomatoes that came with my excuse for a Angus steak, had obviously not been blotted on towels. They were saturated and glistening with oil like small round greasy sponges. Complimented by a few tasteless boiled spuds, this was a feast not soon forgotten. I ended up pushing my plate away in disgust after a few bites.This was our second stab at trying to experience what others have said was one of Berkeley's best restaurants; our first visit last year being questionable, though forgivable.This is one of the few times in my culinary life I have actually felt restaurantally abused.  lol! My British wife suggested that  I send this review to Chef Gordon Ramsay suggesting Lalime's as a candidate for his scathing restaurant makeover show. I'll stick to Jimmy Bean's, Salt and T-Rex and won't be back here anytime soon.P.S. Their unfiltered tap water continues to be excellent .
I have been coming to this restaurant for 10 years and never have been dissapointed. This has been my favorite East Bay restaurant for a while. Please keep up the good work!
Lalime's is a solid restaurant.  It deserves 4-4.5 stars.  Truly.  I honestly have enjoyed almost every meal I've had there.  It was our 2 year wedding anniversary and we tried to get into Chez panisse (the restaurant), but it being what it is, we never got off the wait list.  So we found ourselves at Lalimes, an old-time favorite.We ordered three small plates and split one large entree: a tomato/fondue dish, lamb croquettes, sardines, and rack of lamb.  The small plates were, indeed, small, but everything was really tasty.  I particularly enjoyed the organic tomatoes baked with cheese (that's the fondue-like dish).  The rack of lamb was also great.  Very moist, and tasty.  We ended the meal with two desserts (fig tart and sorbet). Both packed a lot of punch.  I enjoy cooking, so I know when something is cooked well.  I really didn't have much to complain about, except the sardines were a lot bonier than I had anticipated.The meal came in around $120 with tax and tip, which isn't cheap for two people, but I was satisfied.  If you're looking for solid food and service, Lalime's is it!
Recently went to Lalime's for our 20th wedding anniversary and was definitely not disappointed.  Very welcoming, attentive service, excellent food, lovely atmosphere and sat upstairs where it is quiet and you can enjoy conversation.  The choice to celebrate our special occasion at Lalime's resulted in a very enjoyable experience and most of all a fond memory.
As a first timer I found K2's little darling very Berkeley-ish in a good way. Good for foodies, romance and relaxation. It has a cozy, charming neighborhood feeling and everything we had was perfecto including the bread service and dessert. Will certainly be back.
My boyfriend and I ate here recently as a special treat.  The menu had a lot of variety and decent prices.  I was excited about trying the venison, but they "ran out", so maybe next time.   The service was very good and several people made sure that we had all that we needed throughout our meal.  We shared a mini-burger with seared foie gras in it and it was sooo tasty!  I wish it were bigger!  The fries were quite delicate and delicious.  We also had the pizzetta which was good but not as good as Chez Panisse's.  (Who knew rich people loved burgers and pizza as much as poor folk?)  My dinner, the lamb, was good but not anything to write home about.  For dessert was an complicated chocolate cake with chocolate-hazelnut ice cream and an anglaise that was presented in a fancy way that made me unsure of how to eat.In all the food was up to par with other fancy restraunts that I've been to, and is a nice place to go for a special occasion.  Stick to the classics here and you won't be disappointed.
I LOVE IT!. The food is Flawless! The service is wonderful. The selection is grand, the menu changes just enough to keep me coming back and they also have new exiting things to offer. for vegetarian: THIS IS NOT YOUR PLACE! the chef there is very, um... pro meat? any way the vegetarian options are very limited! BUT this place in wonderful!
What an elegant restaurant!  The service was incredible and the food was even better.  My lamb was cooked perfectly.  I'll be back again!
Great service, very special. But get ready to drop some money. The staff is fun and nice not snotty like some upscale places.
Food was so so, service was good, price was high.  Not coming back.We ordered some scallops for appetizers, and were shocked there were two little scallops on a plate.  Quite under whelming.  The carnitas was dry and tasteless (I miss my taco truck!).Lalime's does have the ambience going for it, and if you're looking for a quiet place to talk, it might be a nice place to go.
Mm, I love this place.  Food and service are fantastic.  They're at their very best during the summer when there's a wide variety of fresh local ingredients.  I wish they had more vegetarian-friendly options, but that's hard to get at any high-end place.  However, there's always at least one main dish that's vegetarian.Despite being delicious, they still feel pretty "secret".  You can get a reservation for two without much advance notice on a Friday or Saturday night.
I've really tried to like Lalime's.  I really have.  But I have to say I've gone there 4 different times over the last couple of years and every time I've been disappointed.  I don't enjoy the food nor the atmosphere.  (But the service was always good.)  The last time was a week ago and my partner actually had a sick stomach for 2 days afterwards.  I think it was from some crab that was on top of a potato that came with her prime rib.  So that's it for me.
As a long-time Lalime's customer, I was shocked to encounter bad service, tiny portions, and mediocre flavors when I recently returned after a two-year's absence. I remember a Lalime's that was worth the price, but that no longer seems exist.
I am shocked that my wife and I could be trying the best places all over Berkeley and SF, yet we never ate here until now (we have date night once a week). My wife picked this place as she deemed it worthy of our special occation (our anniversary). Everything was excellent: service, food, and ambiance. Ambiance might be a 4 star, but the service and food covered that gap for a five overall.The NY steak was perfect. Everything was perfect (except the orange peel on the gnocci side dish). It didn't hurt that we brought a 2005 Brunello with us, which also kept the tab down to a very reasonable level. We will be back!
I've been to Lalime's numerous times over many years and have usually enjoyed the food and the service.  However in recent years we had found the quality to be somewhat variable and this past summer we had a meal that was poor - we decided that we wouldn't be coming back - as the quality of the food no longer justified the prices.  As an aside we also felt the other K2 Restaurants had slipped in quality.Well, we heard that George Morrone had taken over as the executive chef of the group and that he was focusing on Lalime's as a start.  So we decided to give it another try and all I can say is that I'm so glad we did.  This was easily the best meal either of us has ever had at Lalime's - every single item was outstanding.To echo what Kenneth R said, we started with the Ahi Tuna Tartare and it was amazing.  The presentation is great too - they bring out a plate with a pretty large serving of tuna tartare in the middle, topped by a raw quail egg, and around the edge of the plate are red and green habaneros, asian pear, pine nuts and mint - each in a delicate pile.  The server mixes them up and then you have at it.  Then we had a side dish of chanterelles as our next course, and then the Striped Bass with clams and mushrooms, and the Squab 'under a brick', parsnip purèe, wild rice ravioli, fresh laurel.  Each was fantastic... the bass was perfectly cooked and flavored from the poaching.... the Squab had a delicious crunchy crust and the parsnip purèe was simply out of this world.All in all, there wasn't a missed step in either the food or the service.  As always, it's not inexpensive, but this time it was more than worth the price.  Now we can't wait for George Morrone to start showing his influence at the other restaurants in the K2 Group.
The atmosphere is great, very charming, cosy, and romantic. The food is very good, although not over the top amazing. The mushroom and corn side is great. The salmon is decent  - delicious crunchy crust, just the way I like it, but the fish itself was a bit too dry.Based on its look,  the steak that some of my friends had was juicy and tender.Unfortunately, I had to leave before the desert came out.I will definitely return for some romantic special occasion. It's hard to find places that are both posh/up-scale and friendly/comfortable at the same time, and Lalime's is definitely one of them.
The outside of this eatery is quite deceptive, it's fairly blah from the outside, but pleasant and inviting inside.We sampled several appetizers including foie gras, sweet breads, pizzetta and soft shell crab. The foie gras and sweetbreads were very nice.For our entrees we had 4 different, Ribeye ( great flavor, just a thin cut) summer squash gratin  was yummy, Lamb, ( nice, potatoes eh, dry and mostly onions) Swordfish nicely done, and the duck with figs and lavender... Delish ! ( would like another fig though!)The wine list also nice, very diverse.Our waiter was a sweet heart, excellent service..Definitely a return visit  or many required.
Excellent food. I had lamb. It was excellently prepared with great flavors. Only downside was the service, which felt busied. Also, my wife asked for some lemon slices which never arrived for her fish.
